Maryland, session 2026, SB0114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 3A. 3–1–1 NONEMERGENCY COMMUNITY INFORMATION AND REFERRAL
SYSTEMS.
1–3A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–801
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
– 1 –

Ch. 434 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) “BOARD” MEANS THE MARYLAND 3–1–1 OVERSIGHT BOARD
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 1–3A–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “CHATBOT” MEANS A COMPUTER PROGRAM AVAILABLE THROUGH A
PHONE NUMBER, A WEBSITE, OR AN APPLICATION THAT SIMULATES HUMAN
CONVERSATION THROUGH TEXT OR VOICE, USING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO
RESPOND TO TYPED QUESTIONS USING INFORMATION FROM CURATED,
AGENCY–APPROVED SOURCES SUCH AS GOVERNMENT WEBSITES, SERVICE
CATALOGS, ORDINANCES, FORMS, AND GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
LAYERS.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE 3–1–1 PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) “3–1–1 SYSTEM” MEANS A TELEPHONE SERVICE OR OTHER
TECHNOLOGY USED TO ACCESS A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICE LINE, DESIGNED
FOR REPORTING AND RESOLVING COMMUNITY INFRASTRUCTURE AND SERVICE
ISSUES ON A NONEMERGENCY BASIS.
(G) “VOICEBOT” MEANS A COMPUTER PROGRAM AVAILABLE THROUGH A
PHONE NUMBER THAT SIMULATES HUMAN CONVERSATION USING ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TECHNOLOGY THAT:
(1) RESPONDS TO VOCAL QUESTIONS OVER THE PHONE USING
INFORMATION FROM CURATED, AGENCY–APPROVED SOURCES SUCH AS
GOVERNMENT WEBSITES, SERVICE CATALOGS, ORDINANCES, FORMS, AND
GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM LAYERS; AND
(2) ROUTES CALLS TO APPROPRIATE DESTINATIONS.
1–3A–02.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND 3–1–1 OVERSIGHT BOARD IN THE MARYLAND
INFORMATION NETWORK.
(B) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF:
(1) TWO MEMBERS OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) TWO MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 434
(3) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) A PERSON WITH EXPERTISE IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
(II) A PERSON WITH EXPERTISE IN GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION
SYSTEMS; AND
(III) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC TO SERVE AS THE
CHAIR OF THE BOARD; AND
(4) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK;
(II) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY;
(III) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT;
(IV) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF AGING;
(V) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES;
(VI) THE MARYLAND 9–1–1 BOARD;
(VII) THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES;
(VIII) THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL LEAGUE;
(IX) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS NOT PARTICIPATING IN
THE PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND DOES NOT HAVE AN
EXISTING 3–1–1 SYSTEM;
(X) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS NOT PARTICIPATING IN
THE PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND HAS AN EXISTING 3–1–1
SYSTEM;
(XI) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND DOES NOT HAVE AN EXISTING
3–1–1 SYSTEM; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 434 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(XII) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND HAS AN EXISTING 3–1–1
SYSTEM.
(C) THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1), (2),
AND (4)(IX) THROUGH (XII) OF THIS SECTION SHALL TERMINATE AFTER THE BOARD
SUBMITS THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 1–3A–05(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST FOUR TIMES PER CALENDAR YEAR.
(E) FOR PURPOSES OF THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT, A PROJECT SITE VISIT OR
EDUCATIONAL FIELD TOUR MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A MEETING OF THE BOARD IF
NO ORGANIZATIONAL BUSINESS IS CONDUCTED.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD;
BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK SHALL PROVIDE STAFF TO
THE BOARD.
1–3A–03.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) DESIGNATE COUNTIES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM;
(2) ESTABLISH EVALUATION CRITERIA FOR THE PROGRAM;
(3) REVIEW VENDOR APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD BY
THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK UNDER § 1–3A–04(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE
AND SELECT A VENDOR;
(4) ENSURE 3–1–1 SYSTEMS ALIGN WITH BEST PRACTICES FOR
TECHNOLOGY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND EQUITY;
(5) APPROVE AND COORDINATE STATEWIDE MARKETING STRATEGIES
FOR THE PROGRAM UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 434
(6) IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM;
(7) ESTABLISH MEMORANDUMS OF UNDERSTANDING WITH
COUNTIES, UTILITIES, AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS TO ENSURE INTEROPERABILITY;
AND
(7) (8) DEVELOP A SET OF UNIFIED STATEWIDE DATA STANDARDS
FOR 3–1–1 SYSTEMS.
(B) MARKETING STRATEGIES APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) ACCESSIBLE;
(2) MULTILINGUAL; AND
(3) CULTURALLY COMPETENT.
1–3A–04.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A 3–1–1 PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO EVALUATE AND EXPAND THE USE
OF 3–1–1 SYSTEMS IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) THE BOARD SHALL DESIGNATE TWO COUNTIES THAT HAVE 3–1–1
SYSTEMS AND TWO COUNTIES THAT DO NOT HAVE 3–1–1 SYSTEMS TO PARTICIPATE
IN THE PROGRAM.
(2) A COUNTY DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY CHOOSE NOT TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM BY SUBMITTING
A LETTER TO THE BOARD WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER THE COUNTY’S DESIGNATION
STATING THE REASON FOR NOT PARTICIPATING.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK
TO:
(1) SOLICIT REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS FROM VENDORS FOR
TECHNOLOGY PLATFORMS AND OTHER SERVICES NECESSARY TO RUN 3–1–1
SYSTEMS FOR THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) SUBMIT A LIST OF POSSIBLE VENDORS TO THE BOARD.
– 5 –

Ch. 434 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A
CHATBOT IN EACH COUNTY DESIGNATED BY THE BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH CHATBOT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) MULTILINGUAL SUPPORT;
(II) INTEGRATION WITH GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
DATA FOR ACCURATE ROUTING; AND
(III) CLEAR ESCALATION PROTOCOLS TO ROUTE COMPLEX
REQUESTS TO LIVE AGENTS.
(3) (I) EACH COUNTY PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM SHALL
DESIGNATE THE SOURCES A CHATBOT MAY USE IN RESPONDING TO QUESTIONS.
(II) 1. THE VENDOR OF THE 3–1–1 SYSTEM CHOSEN TO HOST
A CHATBOT SHALL ANALYZE THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CHATBOT BASED ON USER
FEEDBACK REGARDING ACCURACY OF CHATBOT RESPONSES.
2. A. THE VENDOR SHALL INVESTIGATE AN ANSWER
THAT A USER DESIGNATES AS INACCURATE.
B. IF THE SOURCE IS DETERMINED TO BE INACCURATE,
THE AGENCY OPERATING THE SOURCE WEBPAGE SHALL UPDATE IT TO BECOME
ACCURATE.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028 2027, THE BOARD SHALL
ESTABLISH A VOICEBOT IN EACH PARTICIPATING COUNTY.
(2) EACH VOICEBOT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) MULTILINGUAL SUPPORT;
(II) THE ABILITY TO TRANSFER CALLS TO 9–1–1, 2–1–1, AND
9–8–8, AS NEEDED;
(III) INTEGRATION WITH GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
DATA FOR ACCURATE ROUTING; AND
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 434
(IV) CLEAR ESCALATION PROTOCOLS TO ROUTE COMPLEX
REQUESTS TO LIVE AGENTS.
(3) THE VENDOR OF THE 3–1–1 SYSTEM CHOSEN TO HOST A VOICEBOT
SHALL ANALYZE THE PERFORMANCE OF THE VOICEBOT IN THE SAME WAY AS THE
CHATBOT UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(3)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE BOARD SHALL IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM IN EACH COUNTY IN THE STATE ACCORDING TO THE IMPLEMENTATION
PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER § 1–3A–05(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
1–3A–05.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, THE BOARD, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK, SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE PROGRESS OF THE
PROGRAM.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) CALL DEFLECTION TRACKING BASED ON THE REDUCTION IN
9–1–1 CALLS FOR THAT TIME PERIOD THE NUMBER OF 3–1–1 CALLS AND REQUESTS
AGGREGATED BY COUNTY;
(II) THE SUBJECT MATTER AND TYPE OF ISSUES RAISED BY
USERS;
(III) HOW A CALL OR REQUEST IS ADDRESSED, INCLUDING:
1. INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE CALLER;
2. THE NUMBER OF CALLS OR REQUESTS TRANSFERRED
TO OTHER SYSTEMS, INCLUDING 9–1–1, 2–1–1, 9–8–8, AND LOCAL 3–1–1; AND
3. WHETHER A SERVICE REQUEST TICKET IS CREATED;
(IV) SERVICE DELIVERY OPTIONS THAT MAINTAIN FLEXIBILITY
FOR THE COUNTY;
(V) ESTIMATES OF A COUNTY’S COSTS AND SAVINGS FOR
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM;
– 7 –

Ch. 434 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) (VI) USER SATISFACTION;
(III) (VII) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE 3–1–1 SYSTEM;
(IV) (VIII) COSTS SAVED BY A EACH PARTICIPATING COUNTY, IF
ANY;
(V) (IX) AN EVALUATION OF THE INTEGRATION OF THE
CHATBOTS AND VOICEBOTS INTO EACH PARTICIPATING COUNTY; AND
(VI) (X) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVEMENT.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK, SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT:
(1) EVALUATES THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM
INCLUDING:
(I) COST EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CHATBOT AND VOICEBOT;
(II) EQUITY IN SERVICE ACCESS;
(III) CHALLENGES OF INTEGRATING THE CHATBOT AND
VOICEBOT INTO COUNTY SYSTEMS;
(IV) USER SATISFACTION; AND
(V) CALL VOLUME DATA FOR 9–1–1 IN THE PROGRAM
COUNTIES; AND
(2) CREATES A COMPREHENSIVE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN TO EXPAND
THE PROGRAM TO EACH COUNTY IN THE STATE AND INCLUDES SERVICE DELIVERY
OPTIONS THAT MAINTAIN IMPLEMENTATION FLEXIBILITY FOR THE COUNTY.
(C) AFTER THE COMPLETION AND SUBMISSION OF THE REPORT REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, EACH COUNTY MAY DETERMINE THE
SCOPE AND MANNER OF ITS PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM.
1–3A–06.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 434
NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REQUIRE THE REPLACEMENT OR PREEMPTION OF ANY
OPERATIONS OR FUNCTIONS OF AN EXISTING 3–1–1 SYSTEM IN THE STATE; OR
(2) PROHIBIT A COUNTY THAT HAS CHOSEN NOT TO PARTICIPATE IN
THE PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04(C)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE FROM SUBSEQUENTLY
CHOOSING TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a 3–1–1 Technical Advisory Committee.
(b) The Committee consists of the following members:
(1) one representative of a county that operates an existing 3–1–1 system,
designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Counties;
(2) one representative of a county that does not operate a 3–1–1 system,
designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Counties;
(3) one 9–1–1 Public Safety Answering Point Director, designated by the
Secretary of Emergency Management, with technical expertise from a county that operates
an existing 3–1–1 system, or their designee;
(4) one 9–1–1 Public Safety Answering Point Director, designated by the
Secretary of Emergency Management, with technical expertise from a county that does not
operate a 3–1–1 system, or their designee;
– 9 –

Ch. 434 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) one geographic information systems expert who is not serving on the
Maryland 3–1–1 Oversight Board, appointed by the Secretary of Information Technology;
and
(6) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) one data interoperability expert; and
(ii) one expert in artificial intelligence applications in public service
deliveries.
(c) A member of the Committee:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Committee; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(d) The Committee shall provide technical guidance to the Maryland 3–1–1
Oversight Board and the 3–1–1 Program to avoid negative unintended consequences
related to interoperability among Maryland 3–1–1 voicebots and chatbots and existing
3–1–1, 2–1–1, 9–1–1, 9–8–8, and local nonemergency public safety systems.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 3 months
and, at the end of September 30, 2028, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required
by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 10 –